Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judicial Council

27A.100.
Membership.

There is hereby created a Judicial Council composed of the following persons: The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his designee from among the members of that court; the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals or his designee from among the members of that court; four (4) Circuit Judges, and four (4) District Judges, all of whom shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court; the president of the Kentucky Association of Circuit Court Clerks; three (3) members of the State Bar of Kentucky who shall be appointed by its board of governors; and the chairmen of the Judiciary Committees of the House of Representatives and of the Senate, or the vice chairman of any of these committees if the chairman declines to serve.

The appointed members shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Vacancies in the office of appointed members shall be filled by the original appointing authority.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be the chairman of the council, or if he is not a member or declines to serve as chairman, a member of the council shall be appointed by him to serve as chairman. The administrative director of the courts shall serve as secretary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 4; 1978, ch. 384, § 7, effective June 17, 1978.

27A.110.
Functions of Judicial Council.

The Judicial Council shall serve in an advisory capacity only. It shall give continuing consideration to the administration of justice in the courts of the Commonwealth. It may submit from time to time to the Supreme Court, either upon request or on its own motion, such recommendations as it may deem advisable for changes in rules, practice, procedure, or other matters pertaining to the judicial system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 5.

27A.120.
Meetings of Judicial Council.

The Judicial Council shall meet at least twice each year at such times and places as shall be designated by its chairman and shall hold such other meetings as shall be called by the chairman.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 6.

27A.130.
Compensation — Expenses.

Members of the Judicial Council shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be allowed their necessary expenses while on the business of the council. All claims for expenses shall be approved by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his designee and shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 7.

27A.140.
Termination of certain terms. [Repealed.]